Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-294.05
Rules and regulations.

The Chief Water Officer of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out sections 46-290 to 46-294.04.

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 25;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 117.